Maryland, session 2025, HB0225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
24–113.2.
(a) [Unless] EXCEPT FOR VEHICLES CARRYING FLUID MILK PRODUCTS OR
UNLESS otherwise provided by federal law, an exceptional hauling permit issued under
this section is not valid on the interstate highway system, as defined in § 8–101(j) of this
article.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the State Highway
Administration may issue an exceptional hauling permit for a combination of vehicles that:
(1) [(i)] Carries farm products as defined in § 10–601(c) of the
Agriculture Article[, other than milk,] that:
[1.] (I) Are loaded in fields, FROM BULK LIQUID MILK
STORAGE TANKS AT ONE OR MORE FARM LOCATIONS, or IN other off–highway locations;
and
[2.] (II) Are the only load of the vehicle; [and]
– 1 –

Ch. 51 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii)] (2) Has an axle configuration of [not less than] FIVE OR six
axles and a front–to–rear centerline axle spacing of not less than 50 feet; AND
[(2) (i) Carries to a processing plant raw liquid milk that is the only load
on the vehicle and is loaded from bulk liquid milk storage tanks at one or more farm
locations; and
(ii) Has an axle configuration of not less than six axles and a
front–to–rear centerline axle spacing of not less than 50 feet; or
(3) (i) Carries to a processing plant from March 1 until June 30 raw
liquid milk that is the only load on the vehicle and is loaded from bulk liquid milk storage
tanks at one or more farm locations; and
(ii) Has an axle configuration of five axles and a distance of at least
28 feet between the last axle on the tractor and the first axle on the semitrailer]
(3) HAS A MINIMUM OF 36 FEET BETWEEN TWO CONSECUTIVE SETS
OF TANDEM AXLES MEASURED HORIZONTALLY BETWEEN THE VERTICAL
CENTERLINES OF THE EXTREME AXLES OF THE TANDEMS.
(c) A combination of vehicles operating under the authority of an exceptional
hauling permit issued under subsection (b) of this section shall COMPLY WITH THE
FOLLOWING WEIGHT LIMITS:
[(1) Comply with the following weight limits:]
[(i)] (1) A maximum of 20,000 pounds gross weight on a single
axle;
[(ii)] (2) For any [consecutive axle configuration of two or more
axles on individual vehicles in the combination, the maximum gross weight specified in §
24–109(d) of this subtitle] TANDEM AXLE, A MAXIMUM OF 40,000 POUNDS GROSS
WEIGHT; and
[(iii)] (3) A maximum GROSS WEIGHT of:
[1.] (I) [87,000] 88,000 pounds [gross combination
weight] for a combination of vehicles [carrying farm products other than milk] WITH FIVE
AXLES; OR
[2.] (II) 95,000 pounds [gross combination weight]
for a combination of vehicles with at least six axles [carrying milk; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 51
3. 88,000 pounds gross combination weight for a combination
of vehicles with five axles carrying milk;
(2) Twice each year, submit to and pass a North American Standard
Driver/Vehicle Level 1 inspection; and
(3) Be allowed a load limit tolerance of only 1,000 pounds for gross
combination weight and 15% for axle weights].
(d) While operating a combination of vehicles under the authority of an
exceptional hauling permit issued under subsection (b) of this section, a person may not:
(1) Violate a highway restriction issued by a competent authority;
(2) [Operate] EXCEPT FOR VEHICLES CARRYING FLUID MILK
PRODUCTS, OPERATE the combination of vehicles on the interstate highway system, as
defined in § 8–101(j) of this article;
(3) Operate the combination of vehicles if the combination of vehicles
exceeds any tire weight rating or tire speed restriction adopted under § 25–111 of this
article; or
(4) Fail to comply with the terms and conditions of the exceptional hauling
permit.
(e) While operating a combination of vehicles under the authority of an
exceptional hauling permit issued under subsection (b) of this section, a person shall have
in the person’s possession:
(1) The original OR ELECTRONIC COPY OF THE exceptional hauling
permit issued for the vehicle; and
(2) For each vehicle in the combination of vehicles, [a copy of] PROOF OF
A CURRENT PREVENTIVE MAINTENANCE INSPECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) FOR VEHICLES REGISTERED IN THE STATE, PROOF OF A
PERIODIC INSPECTION REQUIRED BY TITLE 23, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) FOR VEHICLES REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE AND
ENGAGED IN INTERSTATE TRANSPORTATION, PROOF OF A PERIODIC INSPECTION
REQUIRED BY 49 C.F.R. § 396.17; AND
(III) FOR ALL TYPES OF FARM VEHICLES OR OTHER VEHICLES
EXEMPT FROM THE PERIODIC INSPECTION REQUIREMENTS OF ITEMS (I) AND (II) OF
– 3 –

Ch. 51 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THIS ITEM, a valid North American Standard Driver/Vehicle Level 1 OR LEVEL 5
inspection report issued within the preceding [180] 364 days that shows no out–of–service
[violations] DEFECTS OR CRITICAL ITEMS.
(f) (1) A violation of this section, regulations adopted to implement this
section, or the terms and conditions of an exceptional hauling permit issued under
subsection (b) of this section shall:
(i) Void the authority granted under the exceptional hauling permit;
(ii) Subject the vehicle to all weight requirements and tolerances
specified in this article; and
(iii) For a violation of a weight restriction specified in this section
that exceeds 5,000 pounds, subject the exceptional hauling permit to immediate
confiscation by an officer or authorized civilian employee of the Department of State Police,
an officer of the Maryland Transportation Authority Police, or any police officer.
(2) A person who confiscates an exceptional hauling permit under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall immediately notify the State Highway
Administration.
(3) On notification of the confiscation of an exceptional hauling permit, the
State Highway Administration shall review the confiscation, SHALL verify the violation of
a weight restriction, and, if the State Highway Administration determines that a violation
did occur, MAY revoke the permit.
(4) An owner or operator of a combination of vehicles may appeal the
revocation of an exceptional hauling permit to the State Highway Administrator or the
Administrator’s designee.
(g) (1) On request from the State Highway Administrator or the
Administrator’s designee, weight and delivery records of the holder of an exceptional
hauling permit that are kept in the normal course of business shall be provided by:
(i) The holder of the exceptional hauling permit; or
(ii) [A facility that receives farm products, as defined in § 10–601(c)
of the Agriculture Article, delivered by a vehicle operating under the authority of an
exceptional hauling permit] ANY MOTOR CARRIER TRANSPORTING FARM PRODUCTS
UNDER AN EXCEPTIONAL HAULING PERMIT.
(2) If the holder of OR MOTOR CARRIER TRANSPORTING FARM
PRODUCTS UNDER an exceptional hauling permit [or a facility that receives farm
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 51
products] does not comply with a request under this subsection, the State Highway
Administration may:
(i) Suspend the holder’s OR MOTOR CARRIER’S exceptional
hauling permit; [or] AND
(ii) [Prohibit a vehicle from delivering farm products under the
authority of the exceptional hauling permit to the noncompliant facility] SUSPEND THE
ELIGIBILITY OF THE HOLDER OR MOTOR CARRIER TO OBTAIN ADDITIONAL
EXCEPTIONAL HAULING PERMITS FOR FARM PRODUCTS PENDING COMPLIANCE.
(h) (1) An applicant for an exceptional hauling permit shall pay to the State
Highway Administration:
(i) 1. $250 for the issuance of a new annual permit or the annual
renewal; or
2. $30 for the issuance of a 30–day permit;
(ii) $1,000 for the reinstatement of a permit that was revoked under
subsection (f)(3) of this section for a first violation; and
(iii) $5,000 for the reinstatement of a permit that was revoked under
subsection (f)(3) of this section for a second or subsequent violation within the prior 24
months.
(2) A fee paid under this subsection is nonrefundable.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an exceptional hauling permit is
valid for:
(1) 1 year from the date of issuance for an annual permit; or
(2) 30 consecutive days for a 30–day permit.
(j) In consultation with the Secretary of State Police, the State Highway
Administration shall adopt regulations to implement this section.
(k) (1) An exceptional hauling permit is issued under this section at the
discretion of the State Highway Administrator.
(2) The State Highway Administrator may stop issuing or renewing
exceptional hauling permits under this section if the Administrator determines that the
use of the permits is adversely affecting any part of the State highway system.
– 5 –

Ch. 51 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) The State Highway Administrator shall promptly report to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, regarding any
decision to stop issuing or renewing exceptional hauling permits under this section and the
reason for the decision.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 6 –